pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de cabelo: Todos os tipos de cabelo; Descolorado; Loiro; Frágil; Moreno; Pintado; Mista; Encaracolado; Danificado; Exigente; Seco; Sem brilho; Tingido; Fina; Frisado; Grisalho; Com madeixas; Sem vida; Queda; Normal; Oleoso; Sensível; Quebradiço; Liso; Espesso; Fino; Tratado; Indisciplinado; Enfraquecido; Outro
tr: Saç Tipine Uygun: Tüm saç tipleri; Açılmış; Sarışın; İnce telli; Esmer; Boyalı; Kombinasyon; Kıvırcık; Hasarlı; Zorlu; Sek; Mat; Boyalı; İnce; Kabarık; Beyazlamış; Röfleli; Cansız; Dökülen; Normal; Yağlı; Hassas; Kırık; Düz; Kalın; İnce; İşlem görmüş; Şekil almayan; Yıpranmış; Diğer
cs: Vhodný typ vlasů: Všechny typy vlasů; Odbarvené; Blond; Lámavé; Hnědé; Barevné; Kombinace; Kudrnaté; Poškozené; Náročný; Suché; Fádní; Obarvené; Jemný; Kudrnaté; Šedé; Zvýrazněné; Vlasy bez života; Ztráta; Normální; Mastný; Citlivý; Rozdělené; Rovné; Silnější; Tenčí; Ošetřené; Nepoddajné; Oslabené; Jiné
ko: 적합한 모발 유형: 모든 모발 유형; 탈색; 금발; 부서지기 쉬움; 브루넷; 염색; 복합; 곱슬; 손상; 까다로운; 드라이; 둔한; 물들인; 파인; 곱슬; 회색; 강조; 생기 없는; 탈모; 일반; 지성; 민감성; 스플릿; 일자형; 띡; 얇은; 치료; 다루기 힘든; 약해진; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta kose za koju je prikladno: Svi tipovi kose; Izbijeljena; Plava kosa; Lomljiva; Smeđa; Obojena; Kombinirana; Kovrčava; Oštećena; Zahtjevna; Suha; Bez sjaja; Obojena; Tanka; Neposlušna; Sijeda; S pramenovima; Beživotna; Gubitak kose; Normalna; Masna; Osjetljiva; Ispucana; Ravna; Gusta; Tanka; Tretirana; Neukrotiva; Oslabljena; Ostalo
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทผม: ผมทุกประเภท; ฟอก; บลอนด์; ผมเปราะ; ผมสีน้ำตาลเข้ม; ทำสี; ผมแบบผสม; ผมหยิก; ผมเสียหาย; ผิวที่ต้องดูแลเป็นพิเศษ; ไม่หวาน; ผมแห้งเสีย; ผมย้อมสี; บาง; ลักษณะชี้ฟู; ผมหงอก; ผมทำไฮไลท์; ผมไร้ชีวิตชีวา; ผมร่วง; ผิวปกติ; ผิวมัน; แพ้ง่าย; ผมแตกปลาย; ผมตรง; หนา; ผมบาง; ผมได้รับการดูแล; ผมยุ่ง; ผมอ่อนแอ; อื่นๆ
fr: Convient au type de cheveux: Tous types de cheveux; Décolorés; Blonds; Cassants; Bruns; Colorés; Mixte; Bouclés; Endommagés; Exigeante; Sec; Ternes; Teints; Fin; Crépus; Gris; Méchés; Sans vie; Perte; Normale; Grasse; Sensible; Fourchus; Lisses; Épais; Fin; Traités; Indisciplinés; Affaiblis; Autre
nl: Geschikt voor haartype: Alle haartypen; Gebleekt; Blond; Broos; Brunette; Gekleurd; Combinatie; Krullend; Beschadigd; Veeleisend; Droog; Saai; Geverfd; Fijn; Kroesachtig; Grijs; Gehighlight; Futloos; Verlies; Normaal; Vettig; Gevoelig; Gespleten; Steil; Dik; Dun; Behandeld; Onhandelbaar; Verzwakt; Andere
zh-CN: 适用发质: 所有发质; 漂白; 浅棕色; 易断; 深褐色; 染色的; 混合肤质; 卷曲; 受损的; 高要求; 干; 暗哑; 染色; 细; 卷曲的; 灰色; 挑染; 干枯; 脱发; 普通; 油性; 敏感; 分叉; 直; 粗; 薄; 处理过; 杂乱; 脆弱的; 其他
en: Suitable for hair type: All hair types; Bleached; Blonde; Brittle; Brunette; Colored; Combination; Curly; Damaged; Demanding; Dry; Dull; Dyed; Fine; Frizzy; Gray; Highlighted; Lifeless; Loss; Normal; Oily; Sensitive; Split; Straight; Thick; Thin; Treated; Unruly; Weakened; Other
vi: Phù hợp với loại tóc: Tất cả các loại tóc; Tóc tẩy; Tóc vàng; Tóc dễ gãy; Tóc nâu; Tóc nhuộm màu; Da hỗn hợp; Tóc xoăn; Tóc hư tổn; Da cần chăm sóc; Không ngọt; Tóc xỉn màu; Tóc nhuộm; Mảnh; Tóc xù; Tóc bạc; Tóc móc lai; Tóc xơ; Tóc rụng; Da thường; Da dầu; Da nhạy cảm; Tóc chẻ ngọn; Tóc thẳng; Dày; Mỏng; Tóc đã ủ; Tóc rối; Tóc yếu; Khác
hu: Hajtípus: Minden hajtípus; Fehérített; Szőke; Törékeny; Barna; Színezett; Kombinált; Göndör; Sérült; Igényes; Száraz; Tompa; Festett; Finom; Tömött; Szürke; Kiemelt; Élettelen; Vesztett; Normál; Olajos; Érzékeny; Osztott; Egyenes; Vastag; Vékony; Kezelt; Kontrollálhatlan; Legyengült; Egyéb
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de cabelo: Todos os tipos de cabelo; Descolorido; Loiro; Frágil; Preto; Colorido; Combinação; Encaracolado; Danificado; Cuidados especiais; Seco; Sem brilho; Tingido; Ralo; Crespo; Grisalho; Com mechas; Sem vida; Perda; Normal; Oleosa; Sensível; Ponta dupla; Liso; Encorpado; Ralo; Quimicamente tratado; Indisciplinado; Enfraquecido; Outro
da: Velegnet til hårtype: Alle hårtyper; Bleget; Blond; Kruset; Brunette; Farvet; Kombineret; Krøllet; Beskadiget; Krævende; Tør; Kedeligt; Farvet; Fin; Kruset; Gråt; Highlightet; Livløst; Hårtab; Normalt; Fedtet; Sensitiv; Splittet; Lige; Tyk; Tyndt; Behandlet; Ustyrligt; Svækket; Andet
fi: Soveltuu hiustyyppiin: Kaikki hiustyypit; Valkaistut; Blondit; Hauraat; Ruskeat hiukset; Värjätyt; Yhdistelmä; Kiharat; Vaurioituneet; Vaativa; Kuiva; Sameat; Värjätyt; Ohut; Pörröiset; Harmaa; Raidoitetut; Elottomat; Hiustenlähtö; Normaali; Rasvainen; Herkkä; Kaksihaaraiset; Suorat; Paksu; Ohut; Käsitellyt; Kurittomat; Heikentyneet; Muu
es: Adecuado para tipo de cabello: Todo tipo de cabello; Decolorado; Rubio; Frágil; Moreno; De color; Combinación; Ondulado; Dañado; Difícil; Seco; Opaco; Teñido; Fino; Encrespado; Gris; Con reflejos; Sin vida; Pérdida; Normal; Grasa; Sensible; Dividido; Liso; Grueso; Fino; Tratado; Indisciplinado; Debilitado; Otros
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla włosów: Do wszystkich typów włosów; Bielone; Blond; Kruche; Brunetka; Farbowane; Kombinacja; Kręcone; Uszkodzone; Wymagające; Sucha; Nudny; Barwione; Dobre; Kędzierzawy; Szary; Podświetlone; Bez życia; Strata; Normalny; Tłusta; Wrażliwe; Split; Prosta; Gruby; Cienki; Po zabiegach; Niesforne; Osłabione; Inne
ja: ドアタイプに適している: すべての髪質; ブリーチ済み; ブロンド; 脆弱毛; ブルネット; カラーリング済み; 混合タイプ; 縮れ毛; 傷んでいる; 扱いが難しい; ドライ; くすんだ; 染めた; ファイン; 縮れた; 白髪; ハイライト; 艶のない; 抜け毛; 普通; オイリー; 敏感; 枝毛; ストレート; 厚みのある; 薄い; 処理済み; くせ毛; 弱った髪; その他
de: Geeignet für diesen Haartyp: Alle Haartypen; Blondiert; Blond; Brüchig; Brünette; Gefärbt; Kombination; Lockig; Beschädigt; Anspruchsvoll; Trocken; Matt; Gefärbt; Fein; Kraus; Grau; Mit Highlights; Kraftlos; Ausfall; Normal; Fettig; Empfindlich; Splissig; Glatt; Dick; Dünn; Behandelt; Widerspenstig; Geschwächt; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Tinka plaukų tipui: Visų tipų plaukams; Šviesinti; Šviesūs; Lūžinėjantys; Tamsūs; Dažyti; Mišrus; Garbanoti; Pažeisti; Nepaklusnūs; Sausas; Praradę žvilgesį; Dažyti; Ploni; Besiveliantys; Žili; Šviesinti sruogelėmis; Praradę gyvybę; Slenkantys; Normalūs; Riebūs; Jautrūs; Skilinėjantys; Tiesūs; Stori; Ploni; Chemiškai apdoroti; Sunkiai suvaldomi; Susilpnėję; Kita
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto las: Vse vrste las; Beljene; Blond; Krhke; Rjave; Barvane; Kombinacija; Kodraste; Poškodovane; Zahtevne; Suhe; Puste; Barvane; Fino; Kodraste; Siva; S prameni; Brez življenja; Izguba las; Normalne; Mastne; Občutljive; Razcepljene; Ravno; Debele; Tanke; Tretirane; Neukrotljive; Oslabljene; Drugo
sv: Lämplig för hårtyp: Alla hårtyper; Blekt; Blond; Sprött; Brunett; Färgat; Kombination; Lockigt; Skadat; Krävande; Torrt; Tråkigt; Färgat; Fint; Krusigt; Grått; Highlights; Livlöst; Håravfall; Normalt; Oljigt; Känsligt; Kluvet; Rakt; Tjockt; Tunt; Behandlat; Ostyrigt; Försvagat; Övrigt
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de păr: Toate tipurile de păr; Decolorat; Blond; Fragil; Brunet; Colorat; Combinată; Creț; Deteriorat; Exigent; Uscat; Tern; Vopsit; Fin; Electrizat; Gri; Șuvițat; Lipsit de viață; Cădere; Normal; Gras; Sensibil; Despicat; Drept; Gros; Subțire; Tratat; Indisciplinat; Slăbit; Altele
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ vlasov: Všetky typy vlasov; Bielené; Blond; Lámavé; Hnedé; Farbené; Kombinácia; Kučeravý; Poškodený; Náročný; Suchý; Nelesklé; Zafarbené; Jemný; Kučeravé; Šedý; Zvýraznené; Bez života; Strata; Normálny; Mastné; Citlivý; Rozštiepené; Rovný; Hrubý; Tenký; Ošetrené; Neposlušný; Oslabený; Iné
ru: Для какого типа волос: Все типы волос; Обесцвеченные; Блонд; Ломкие; Брюнетки; Окрашенные; Комбинированные; Кудрявые; Поврежденные; Требовательные; Сухие; Тусклые; Окрашенные; Тонкие; Вьющиеся; Седые; Осветленные; Безжизненные; Выпадение; Нормальные; Жирные; Чувствительные; Секущиеся; Прямые; Толстые; Тонкие; Обработанные; Непослушные; Ослабленные; Другие
it: Tipo di capelli ideale: Tutti i tipi di capelli; Decolorati; Biondo; Fragili; Castani; Colorati; Mista; Ricci; Danneggiati; Esigente; Secco; Spenti; Tinti; Fine; Crespi; Grigio; Con colpi di sole; Senza vita; Perdita; Normale; Grassa; Sensibile; Divisa; Dritto; Spesso; Sottile; Trattati; Indisciplinati; Indeboliti; Altro
nb: Egnet for årtype: Alle hårtyper; Bleket; Blondt; Skjørt; Brunette; Farget; Kombinasjon; Krøllete; Skadet; Krevende; Tørr; Matt; Farget; Tynn; Krusete; Grå; Striper; Livløst; Hårtap; Normal; Fet; Sensitiv; Splitt; Rett; Tykk; Tynn; Behandlet; Uregjerlig; Svekket; Annet
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο μαλλιών: Όλοι οι τύποι μαλλιών; Ξεθωριασμένος; Ξανθό; Εύθραυστος; Brunette; Εγχρωμος; Συνδυαστική; Κατσαρά; Σκάρτος; Διεκδικητικός; Ξηρό κούρδισμα; Αμβλύς; Βαμμένο; Λεπτές; Κατσαρός; Γκρι; Επισημαίνεται; Αψυχος; Απώλεια; Κανονικός; Ελαιώδης; Ευαίσθητο στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία; ΔιαχωρισμένοΣπλιτ; Ευθεία; Παχύ; Λεπτό; Κέραστος; Ατακτος; Αποδυναμωμένος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип коса: Всички типове коса; Изрусена; Руса; Чуплива; Брюнетка; Боядисана; Комбинация; Къдрава; Увредена; Взискателна; Суха; Изтощена; Оцветена; Фина; Къдрава; Сива; На кичури; Безжизнена; Косопад; Нормална; Мазна; Чувствителна; Цъфтяща; Права; Дебела; Тънка; Третирана; Неуправляема; Отслабена; Други
zh-TW: 適用髮質: 所有髮質; 漂白; 金髮; 脆弱; 深色頭髮; 染後; 混合性; 捲曲; 受損; 要求高; 乾式; 暗淡; 染過; 細; 毛躁; 灰白; 挑染; 無彈性; 脫落; 中性; 油性; 敏感; 分叉; 直; 厚; 薄; 處理過; 蓬亂; 衰弱; 其他